Montana, session 2025, SB47.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-27-213, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-27-213. Yes and no statement. (1) A yes and no statement specifies that a positive vote
indicates support for the issue and a negative vote indicates opposition to the issue.
(2) The yes and no statement must be placed beside the diagram provided for marking of the
ballot in a manner similar to the following:
☐ YES on (insert the type of ballot issue and its number)
☐ NO on (insert the type of ballot issue and its number)
(3) The type of ballot issue and its number required by subsection (2) must be designated by the
secretary of state as provided in 13-27-237 after the secretary of state receives notice from the attorney general
or a court that the petition has been found legally sufficient as provided in this part.
(4) The yes and no statement may not include additional material beyond the requirements of
subsection (2)."

Section 2. Section 13-27-216, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-27-216. Statutory initiative process and procedure. (1) (a) A proponent of a statutory initiative
shall submit the text of the proposed statutory initiative to the secretary of state together with draft ballot
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 47

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 47.1
statements and the filing fee required by 13-27-215. The secretary of state shall, without undue delay, forward a
copy of the text of the proposed statutory initiative and ballot statements to the legislative services division for
review in accordance with 13-27-225.
(b) A proposed statutory initiative may not be accepted by the secretary of state until 10 days after
the adjournment sine die of the regular legislative session preceding the general election during which the
proposal is intended to be voted on. The prohibitions on acceptance of a proposed statutory initiative provided
in this subsection (1)(b) do not apply to a submission received on or after the date that falls 130 days after the
date that the legislature convened in regular session pursuant to 5-2-103, even if the legislature has not
adjourned sine die. If the secretary of state rejects a proposed statutory initiative pursuant to this subsection
(1)(b), the secretary of state shall promptly notify the person who submitted the proposal of the reason for the
rejection.
(2) Within 14 days after receiving the proposed statutory initiative from the secretary of state, the
legislative services division shall respond in writing to the proponent in accordance with 13-27-225.
(3) After the proponent responds to the legislative services division as provided in 13-27-225, the
proponent shall submit the final text of the proposed statutory initiative and ballot statements to the secretary of
state. However, if a response to the legislative services division is not required by the proponent pursuant to 13-
27-225, the proponent shall instead submit the final text of the proposed statutory initiative and ballot
statements to the secretary of state after the proponent receives the legislative services division's response.
(4) On receipt of the final text of the proposed statutory initiative and the ballot statements, the
secretary of state shall reject the proposed statutory initiative if the text or a ballot statement contains material
not submitted to the legislative services division that is a substantive change not recommended by the
legislative services division. Otherwise, the secretary of state shall, without undue delay, refer a copy of the
proposed statutory initiative and ballot statements concurrently to the budget director and to the attorney
general for the attorney general's review in accordance with 13-27-226.
(5) The budget director shall determine whether a fiscal note is necessary. If the budget director
determines a fiscal note is necessary, the budget director shall prepare a fiscal note, notify the attorney general
of the necessity of the fiscal note, and provide a copy of the fiscal note pursuant to 13-27-227 within 10 days.
Receipt of the notice from the budget director begins the time frame in subsection (7).
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 47

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 47.1
(6) In addition to the requirements of 13-27-226, the attorney general shall:
(a) include in the attorney general's legal sufficiency review whether the proposed statutory
initiative constitutes an appropriation as set forth in 13-27-239; and
(b) review the proposed statutory initiative as to whether the proposal could cause a regulatory
taking under Montana law or otherwise will likely cause significant material harm to one or more business
interests in the state if approved by the voters. If the attorney general determines the proposed statutory
initiative will likely cause significant material harm to one or more business interests in the state, the attorney
general shall notify the secretary of state, which must include the finding set forth in 13-27-238(2) on the final
form of the petition.
(7) Within 30 days of receipt of the proposed statutory initiative from the secretary of state, the
attorney general shall complete the requirements set forth in 13-27-226 and subsection (6) of this section.
(8) The secretary of state shall review the legal sufficiency opinion received pursuant to 13-27-226.
(a) If the attorney general finds that the proposed statutory initiative is not legally sufficient, the
secretary of state shall, without undue delay, send written notice to the person who submitted the proposal that
the proposed statutory initiative has been rejected. The notice must include a copy of the attorney general's
legal sufficiency opinion.
(b) If the attorney general or a court finds that the proposed statutory initiative is legally sufficient,
the secretary of state shall, without undue delay, provide the executive director of the legislative services
division a copy of the final text of the proposed statutory initiative and ballot statements in accordance with 13-
27-228. After the executive director of the legislative services division provides the secretary of state the
outcome of the vote as required by 13-27-228, the secretary of state shall immediately send a sample petition
form as provided in 13-27-233 to the person submitting the proposed statutory initiative."

Section 3. Section 13-27-217, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-27-217. Statutory referendum process and procedure. (1) (a) A proponent of a statutory
referendum shall submit the text of the proposed statutory referendum to the secretary of state together with
draft ballot statements and the filing fee required by 13-27-215. The secretary of state shall forward a copy of
the text of the proposed statutory referendum and ballot statements to the legislative services division for
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 47

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 47.1
review in accordance with 13-27-225.
(b) A proposed statutory referendum may not be accepted by the secretary of state until 10 days
after the adjournment sine die of the regular legislative session preceding the general election during which the
proposal is intended to be voted on. The prohibitions on acceptance of a proposed statutory referendum
provided in this subsection (1)(b) do not apply to a submission received on or after the date that falls 130 days
after the date that the legislature convened in regular session pursuant to 5-2-103, even if the legislature has
not adjourned sine die. If the secretary of state rejects a proposed statutory referendum pursuant to this
subsection (1)(b), the secretary of state shall promptly notify the person who submitted the proposal of the
reason for the rejection.
(2) Within 7 days after receiving the proposed statutory referendum from the secretary of state, the
legislative services division shall respond in writing to the proponent in accordance with 13-27-225.
(3) After the proponent responds to the legislative services division as provided in 13-27-225, the
proponent shall submit the final text of the proposed statutory referendum and ballot statements to the
secretary of state. However, if a response to the legislative services division is not required by the proponent
pursuant to 13-27-225, the proponent shall instead submit the final text of the proposed statutory referendum
and ballot statements to the secretary of state after the proponent receives the legislative services division's
response.
(4) On receipt of the final text of the proposed statutory referendum and the ballot statements, the
secretary of state shall reject the proposed statutory referendum if the text or a ballot statement contains
material not submitted to the legislative services division that is a substantive change not recommended by the
legislative services division. Otherwise, the secretary of state shall refer a copy of the proposed statutory
referendum and ballot statements concurrently to the budget director and the attorney general.
(5) (a) The budget director shall determine whether a fiscal note is necessary, prepare the fiscal
note, notify the attorney general of the necessity of its determination, and provide a copy of the fiscal note, if
required, pursuant to 13-27-227 within the timeframe required in subsection (5)(b). Receipt of the notice from
the budget director begins the time frame in subsection (6) for the attorney general's review in accordance with
13-27-226.
(b) If the legislative act that is the subject of the proposed statutory referendum had a fiscal note
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 47

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 47.1
prepared pursuant to 5-4-202 during the legislative session in which the bill was proposed, the budget director
shall return the fiscal note to the attorney general within 3 days. If the legislative act that is the subject of the
proposed statutory referendum did not have a fiscal note prepared pursuant to 5-4-202 during the legislative
session in which the bill was proposed, the budget director shall return the fiscal note to the attorney general
within 6 days.
(6) If the budget director is allowed 3 days to return the fiscal note pursuant to subsection (5), the
attorney general shall complete the requirements set forth in 13-27-226 within 14 days of the receipt of the
proposed statutory referendum from the secretary of state. However, if the budget director is allowed 6 days to
return the fiscal note pursuant to subsection (5), the attorney general shall complete the requirements set forth
in 13-27-226 within 17 days of the receipt of the proposed statutory referendum from the secretary of state.
(7) The secretary of state shall review the legal sufficiency opinion received pursuant to 13-27-226.
If the attorney general:
(a) If the attorney general finds that the proposed statutory referendum is not legally sufficient, the
secretary of state shall, without undue delay, send written notice to the person who submitted the proposal that
the proposed statutory referendum has been rejected. The notice must include a copy of the attorney general's
legal sufficiency opinion.
(b) If the attorney general or a court finds that the proposed statutory referendum is legally
sufficient, the secretary of state shall immediately send a sample petition form as provided in 13-27-233 to the
person submitting the proposed statutory referendum."

Section 4. Section 13-27-218, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-27-218. Constitutional initiative process and procedure. (1) A proponent of a constitutional
initiative shall submit the text of the proposed constitutional initiative to the secretary of state together with draft
ballot statements and the filing fee required by 13-27-215. The secretary of state shall, without undue delay,
forward a copy of the text of the proposed constitutional initiative and ballot statements to the legislative
services division for review in accordance with 13-27-225.
(2) Within 14 days after receiving the proposed constitutional initiative from the secretary of state,
the legislative services division shall respond in writing to the proponent in accordance with 13-27-225.
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 47

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 47.1
(3) After the proponent responds to the legislative services division as provided in 13-27-225, the
proponent shall submit the final text of the proposed constitutional initiative and ballot statements to the
secretary of state. However, if a response to the legislative services division is not required by the proponent
pursuant to 13-27-225, the proponent shall instead submit the final text of the proposed constitutional initiative
and ballot statements to the secretary of state after the proponent receives the legislative services division's
response.
(4) On receipt of the final text of the proposed constitutional initiative and the ballot statements, the
secretary of state shall reject the proposed constitutional initiative if the text or a ballot statement contains
material not submitted to the legislative services division that is a substantive change not recommended by the
legislative services division. Otherwise, the secretary of state shall, without undue delay, refer a copy of the
proposed constitutional initiative and ballot statements concurrently to the budget director and to the attorney
general.
(5) The budget director shall determine whether a fiscal note is necessary, prepare the fiscal note,
notify the attorney general of the necessity of the fiscal note, and provide a copy of the fiscal note pursuant to
13-27-227 within 10 days. Receipt of the notice from the budget director begins the timeframe in subsection (7)
for the attorney general's review in accordance with 13-27-226.
(6) In addition to the requirements in 13-27-226, the attorney general shall review the proposed
constitutional initiative as to whether the proposal could cause a regulatory taking under Montana law or
otherwise will likely cause significant material harm to one or more business interests in the state if approved by
the voters. If the attorney general determines the proposed constitutional initiative will likely cause significant
material harm to one or more business interests in the state, the attorney general shall notify the secretary of
state, which must include the finding set forth in 13-27-241 on the final form of the petition.
(7) Within 30 days of receipt of the fiscal note determination from the budget director, the attorney
general shall complete the requirements set forth in 13-27-226 and subsection (6) of this section.
(8) The secretary of state shall review the legal sufficiency opinion received pursuant to 13-27-226.
If the attorney general:
(a) If the attorney general finds that the proposed constitutional initiative is not legally sufficient, the
secretary of state shall, without undue delay, send written notice to the person who submitted the proposal that
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 47

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 47.1
the proposed constitutional initiative has been rejected. The notice must include a copy of the attorney general's
legal sufficiency opinion.
(b) If the attorney general or a court finds that the proposed constitutional initiative is legally
sufficient, the secretary of state shall, without undue delay, provide the executive director of the legislative
services division a copy of the final text of the proposed constitutional initiative and ballot statements in
accordance with 13-27-228. After the executive director of the legislative services division provides the
secretary of state the outcome of the vote as required by 13-27-228, the secretary of state shall immediately
send a sample petition form as provided in 13-27-233 to the person submitting the proposed constitutional
initiative."

Section 5. Section 13-27-219, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-27-219. Constitutional convention initiative process and procedure. (1) A proponent of a
constitutional convention initiative shall submit the text of the proposed constitutional convention initiative to the
secretary of state together with draft ballot statements and the filing fee required by 13-27-215. The secretary of
state shall, without undue delay, forward a copy of the text of the proposed constitutional convention initiative
and ballot statements to the legislative services division for review in accordance with 13-27-225.
(2) Within 14 days after receiving the proposed constitutional convention initiative from the
secretary of state, the legislative services division shall respond in writing to the proponent in accordance with
13-27-225.
(3) After the proponent responds to the legislative services division as provided in 13-27-225, the
proponent shall submit the final text of the proposed constitutional convention initiative and ballot statements to
the secretary of state. However, if a response to the legislative services division is not required by the
proponent pursuant to 13-27-225, the proponent shall instead submit the final text of the proposed
constitutional convention initiative and ballot statements to the secretary of state after the proponent receives
the legislative services division's response.
(4) On receipt of the final text of the proposed constitutional convention initiative and the ballot
statements, the secretary of state shall reject the proposed constitutional convention initiative if the text or a
ballot statement contains material not submitted to the legislative services division that is a substantive change
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – SB 47

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 47.1
not recommended by the legislative services division. Otherwise, the secretary of state shall, without undue
delay, refer a copy of the proposed constitutional convention initiative and ballot statements concurrently to the
budget director and to the attorney general.
(5) The budget director shall determine whether a fiscal note is necessary, prepare the fiscal note,
notify the attorney general of the necessity of the fiscal note, and provide a copy of the fiscal note pursuant to
13-27-227 within 10 days. Receipt of the notice from the budget director begins the time frame in subsection (6)
and the attorney general's review in accordance with 13-27-226.
(6) Within 30 days of receipt of the fiscal note determination from the budget director, the attorney
general shall complete the requirements set forth in 13-27-226.
(7) The secretary of state shall review the legal sufficiency opinion received pursuant to 13-27-226.
If the attorney general:
(a) If the attorney general finds that the proposed constitutional convention initiative is not legally
sufficient, the secretary of state shall, without undue delay, send written notice to the person who submitted the
proposal that the proposed constitutional convention initiative has been rejected. The notice must include a
copy of the attorney general's legal sufficiency opinion.
(b) If the attorney general or a court finds that the proposed constitutional convention initiative is
legally sufficient, the secretary of state shall, without undue delay, provide the executive director of the
legislative services division a copy of the final text of the proposed constitutional convention initiative and ballot
statements in accordance with 13-27-228. After the executive director of the legislative services division
provides the secretary of state the outcome of the vote as required by 13-27-228, the secretary of state shall
immediately send a sample petition form as provided in 13-27-233 to the person submitting the proposed
constitutional convention initiative."

Section 6. Section 13-27-228, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-27-228. Review by legislative committee. (1) If the attorney general finds that a proposed
statewide initiative is determined to be legally sufficient as provided in this part, the secretary of state shall
provide the executive director of the legislative services division with a copy of the final text of the proposed
statewide initiative and ballot statements. The executive director shall forward the information to the appropriate
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – SB 47

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 47.1
interim committee for review in accordance with 5-5-215. If questions arise regarding which interim committee
has jurisdiction over the matter, the executive director shall direct the review to the legislative council in
accordance with 5-11-105.
(2) (a) The appropriate interim committee or the legislative council shall meet and hold a public
hearing after receiving the information and vote to either support or not support the placement of the proposed
statewide initiative text on the ballot.
(b) The interim committee or the legislative council may request a fiscal note if one was previously
not determined necessary and may request a revised fiscal note from the budget director if new information is
provided which would impact the fiscal note determination or accuracy of the initial fiscal note.
(c) For the purposes of this section, proxies must be allowed for legislators unable to participate if
a quorum of the interim committee or legislative council meets.
(d) Nothing in this section prevents the interim committee or legislative council from meeting
remotely or via conference call or other electronic means.
(3) (a) The executive director shall provide written correspondence to the secretary of state stating
the name of the council or interim committee that voted on the proposal pursuant to subsection (2)(a), the date
of the vote, and the outcome of the vote conducted in accordance with this section.
(b) The outcome of the vote must be submitted to the secretary of state no later than 14 days after
receipt of the final text of the proposed statewide initiative and ballot statements.
(4) The outcome of the vote by an interim committee or the legislative council may not be reflected
in the statewide initiative's statement of purpose and implication, the statewide initiative's petition title, or the
ballot title if the statewide initiative is placed on the ballot."

Section 7. Section 13-27-233, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-27-233. Provision of finalized petition for signature. (1) When the requirements of 13-27-216,
13-27-217, 13-27-218, or 13-27-219 are complete and the proposed statewide ballot issue has been found
legally sufficient pursuant to a court decision or 13-27-226, the secretary of state shall immediately send to the
person submitting the proposed statewide ballot issue a sample petition form, including the text of the proposed
statewide ballot issue, the statement of purpose and implication, and the yes and no statement, as prepared by
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – SB 47

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 47.1
the petitioner, reviewed by the legislative services division, and approved by the attorney general or a court and
in the form provided by this part.
(2) A signature gatherer may circulate the petition only in the form of the sample prepared by the
secretary of state.
(3) The secretary of state shall immediately provide a copy of the sample petition form to any
interested parties who have made a request to be informed of an approved petition."

NEW SECTION. Section 8. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.

NEW SECTION. Section 9. Applicability. [This act] applies to statewide ballot issues submitted to
the secretary of state on or after [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – SB 47